New Jersey, session 221, S599.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section: Electronic payment system means an entity, which is not a national bank, that directly, or through licensed members, processors or agents, provides the proprietary services, infrastructure, and software that route information and data to facilitate transaction authorization, clearance, and settlement, and that merchants access in order to accept a brand of general-purpose credit cards, charge cards, debit cards or store-valued cards as payments for goods or services. Merchant means a person or entity doing business in this State which offers goods or services for sale in this State. b.    Whenever a public health emergency is declared by the Governor pursuant to the Emergency Health Powers Act, P.L.2005, c.222 (C.26:13-1 et seq.) and is in effect, or a state of emergency is declared by the governor pursuant to P.L.1942, c.251 (C.App.A:9-33 et seq.) and is in effect, or both, no electronic payment system may, directly or through an agent, acquirer, processor or member of the system, impose a fee on a merchant for the manual entry of a credit card that is higher than the fee imposed for an electronic credit card transaction. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.